Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.060

Native American voting rights—Civil actions.

(1) The attorney general may bring a civil action for such declaratory or injunctive relief as is necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 29A.40.170 (3) and (4) in the superior court of the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred.

(2) A person or federally recognized tribal government may bring a civil action for declaratory or injunctive relief with respect to RCW 29A.08.112(3), 29.08.310(2), or 29A.40.170 (3) and (4), in the superior court of the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred if:

(a) In the case of a violation that occurs more than one hundred twenty days before an election, that person or tribal government provides notice of the violation to the secretary of state, the violation remains, and ninety days or more have passed since the secretary of state has received the written notice;

(b) In the case of a violation that occurs one hundred twenty days or fewer before an election, that person or tribal government provides notice of the violation to the secretary of state, the violation remains and twenty days or more have passed since the secretary of state has received the written notice; or

(c) In the case of a violation that occurs thirty days or fewer before an election, without providing notice of the violation to the secretary of state.

[ 2019 c 6 s 7.]